Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3A M.J. Banks and Banking, §  116.2; 4B M.J. Corporations, § 2; 7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 11.

§ 13.1-601.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the Virginia Stock Corporation Act.

History.

Code 1950, §

13.1-1

; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522.

Cross references.

As to financial institutions and services, generally, see Title 6.2 (§

6.2-100

et seq.).

As to the Virginia Business Trust Act, see Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.).

Editor’s note.

At its 1983 session, the General Assembly directed the Virginia Code Commission to make a careful study of Chapters 1 (§

13.1-1

et seq.) and 2 (§

13.1-201

et seq.) of this title and to report its findings in the form of a revision. The report, entitled “Report of the Virginia Code Commission on the Revision of Chapters 1 and 2 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia,” was published as House Document 13 of the 1985 session, and contains revisor’s notes and comments which, while valuable, are too voluminous for inclusion here. The Code Commission’s draft of the revision formed the basis of Chapter 522 of the Acts of 1985, which repealed Chapters 1 and 2 of this title and enacted in lieu thereof Chapters 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.), 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.), and 11 (§

13.1-981

et seq.) of this title.

Many of the cases cited in the notes under Chapters 9 and 10 were decided under corresponding provisions of former law.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

For a review of corporate law in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 841 (1999).

For an article, “Misunderstanding Director Duties: The Strange Case of Virginia,” see 56 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1127 (1999).

For an essay, “New Game Plan or Business as Usual?
A Critique of the Team Production Model of Corporate Law,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1001 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For article summarizing significant features of 2005 amendments to the Virginia Stock Corporation Act, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 165 (2005).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-602.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The General Assembly shall have power to amend or repeal all or part of this Act at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to this Act shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-129; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-603.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Articles of incorporation”
means all documents constituting, at any particular time, the charter of a corporation. It includes the original charter issued by the General Assembly, a court or the Commission and all amendments including certificates of consolidation, serial designation, reduction, correction, and merger. It excludes articles of share exchange filed by an acquiring corporation. When the articles of incorporation have been restated pursuant to any articles of restatement, amendment, domestication, or merger, it includes only the restated articles of incorporation, including any articles of serial designation, without the accompanying articles of restatement, amendment, domestication, or merger. When used with respect to a foreign corporation, the

“articles of incorporation”

of such entity means the document that is equivalent to the articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation.

“Authorized shares”
means the shares of all classes a domestic or foreign corporation is authorized to issue.

“Beneficial shareholder”
means a person that owns the beneficial interest in shares, which may be a record shareholder or a person on whose behalf shares are registered in the name of an intermediary as nominee.

“Certificate,”
when relating to articles filed with the Commission, means the order of the Commission that makes the articles effective, together with the articles.

“Commission”
means the State Corporation Commission of Virginia.

“Conspicuous”
means so written, displayed, or presented that a reasonable person against whom the writing is to operate should have noticed it. For example, text that is italicized, is in boldface, contrasting colors, or capitals, or is underlined, is conspicuous.

“Corporation”
or

“domestic corporation”

means a corporation authorized by law to issue shares, irrespective of the nature of the business to be transacted, organized under this chapter or existing pursuant to the laws of the Commonwealth on January 1, 1986, or which, by virtue of articles of incorporation, amendment, or merger, has become a domestic corporation of the Commonwealth, even though also being a corporation organized under laws other than the laws of the Commonwealth, or that has become a domestic corporation of the Commonwealth pursuant to Article 12.1 (§

13.1-722.1:1

et seq.) or Article 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.) of this chapter or Article 15 (§

13.1-1081

et seq.) of Chapter 12.

“Deliver”
or

“delivery”

means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery, and, if authorized in accordance with §

13.1-610

, electronic transmission.

“Derivative proceeding”
means a civil suit in the right of a domestic corporation or, to the extent provided in Article 8.1 (§

13.1-672.1

et seq.), a foreign corporation.

“Disinterested director”
means, except with respect to Article 14 (§

13.1-725

et seq.), a director who, at the time action is to be taken under subdivision B 5 of §

13.1-619

, §

13.1-672.4

,

13.1-691

,

13.1-699

, or

13.1-701

, does not have (i) a financial interest in a matter that is the subject of such action or (ii) a familial, financial, professional, employment, or other relationship with a person who has a financial interest in the matter, either of which would reasonably be expected to impair the objectivity of the director’s judgment when participating in the action, and if the action is to be taken under §

13.1-699

or

13.1-701

, is also not a party to the proceeding. The presence of one or more of the following circumstances shall not by itself prevent a person from being a disinterested director: (i) nomination or election of the director to the board by any director who is not a disinterested director with respect to the matter or by any person that has a material relationship with that director, acting alone or participating with others; (ii) service as a director of another corporation of which a director who is not a disinterested director with respect to the matter, or any person that has a material relationship with that director, is or was also a director; or (iii) at the time action is to be taken under §

13.1-672.4

, status as a named defendant, as a director against whom action is demanded, or as a director who approved the act being challenged.

“Distribution”
means a direct or indirect transfer of cash or other property, except the corporation’s own shares, or incurrence of indebtedness by a corporation to or for the benefit of its shareholders in respect of any of its shares. A distribution may be in the form of a payment of a dividend; a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of shares; a distribution of indebtedness of the corporation; a distribution in liquidation; or otherwise. Distribution does not include an acquisition by a corporation of its shares from the estate or personal representative of a deceased shareholder, or any other shareholder, but only to the extent the acquisition is effected using the proceeds of insurance on the life of such deceased shareholder and the board of directors approved the policy and the terms of the redemption prior to the shareholder’s death.

“Document”
means (i) any tangible medium on which information is inscribed, and includes handwritten, typed, printed, or similar instruments and copies of such instruments, or (ii) an electronic record.

“Domestic”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of the Commonwealth.

“Domestic business trust”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1201

.

“Domestic limited liability company”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Domestic limited partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.1

.

“Domestic nonstock corporation”
has the same meaning as

“domestic corporation”

as specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Domestic partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit formed under §

50-73.88

, or predecessor law of the Commonwealth, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of the Commonwealth, a registered limited liability partnership.

“Effective date,”
when referring to a document for which effectiveness is contingent upon issuance of a certificate by the Commission, means the time and date determined in accordance with §

13.1-606

.

“Effective date of notice”
is defined in subdivision A 9 of §

13.1-610

.

“Electronic”
means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic record”
means information that is stored in an electronic or other nontangible medium and is retrievable in paper form through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with subdivision A 10 of §

13.1-610

.

“Electronic transmission”
or

“electronically transmitted”

means any form or process of communication, not directly involving the physical transfer of paper or another tangible medium, that (i) is suitable for the retention, retrieval, and reproduction of information by the recipient, and (ii) is retrievable in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with subdivision A 10 of §

13.1-610

.

“Eligible entity”
means a domestic or foreign unincorporated entity or a domestic or foreign nonstock corporation.

“Eligible interests”
means interests or memberships.

“Employee”
includes, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, an officer but not a director. A director may accept duties that make the director also an employee.

“Entity”
includes any domestic or foreign corporation; any domestic or foreign nonstock corporation; any domestic or foreign unincorporated entity; any estate or trust; and any state, the United States and any foreign government.

“Expenses”
means reasonable expenses of any kind that are incurred in connection with a matter.

“Filing entity”
means an unincorporated entity other than a general partnership.

“Foreign,”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth.

“Foreign business trust”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1201

.

“Foreign corporation”
means a corporation authorized by law to issue shares, organized under laws other than the laws of the Commonwealth.

“Foreign limited liability company”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Foreign limited partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.1

.

“Foreign nonstock corporation”
means a corporation that is incorporated under a law other than the law of the Commonwealth and would, based on its public organic record, be a nonstock corporation if incorporated under the law of the Commonwealth.

“Foreign partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit formed under the laws of any state or jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of the Commonwealth, a foreign registered limited liability partnership.

“Foreign registered limited liability partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.79

.

“Foreign unincorporated entity”
means a foreign partnership, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign business trust.

“Government subdivision”
includes authority, county, district, and municipality.

“Governor”
means any person under whose authority the powers of an entity are exercised and under whose direction the activities and affairs of the entity are managed pursuant to the organic law governing the entity and its organic rules.

“Includes”
and

“including”

denote a partial definition as a nonexclusive list.

“Individual”
means a natural person.

“Interest”
means either or both of the following rights under the organic law governing an unincorporated entity:

The right to receive distributions from the entity either in the ordinary course or upon liquidation; or

The right to receive notice or to vote on issues involving its internal affairs, other than as an agent, assignee, proxy or person responsible for managing its business and affairs.“Interest holder” means a person who holds of record an interest.“Interest holder liability” means:

Solely by reason of the person’s status as a shareholder, member, or interest holder; or

By the articles of incorporation of the domestic corporation or the organic rules of the eligible entity or foreign corporation that make one or more specified shareholders, members, or interest holders, or categories of shareholders, members, or interest holders, liable in their capacity as shareholders, members, or interest holders for all or specified liabilities of the corporation or eligible entity; or

1.

Personal liability for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a domestic or foreign corporation or domestic or foreign eligible entity that is imposed on a person:

2.

An obligation of a shareholder, member, or interest holder under the articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation or the organic rules of an eligible entity or foreign corporation to contribute to the entity.For purposes of the foregoing, except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation or the organic law or organic rules of an eligible entity or a foreign corporation, interest holder liability arises under subdivision 1 when the corporation or eligible entity incurs the liability.
“Jurisdiction of formation”
means the state or country the law of which includes the organic law governing a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity.

“Means”

denotes an exhaustive definition.

“Membership”

means the rights of a member in a domestic or foreign nonstock corporation or limited liability company.

“Merger”

means a transaction pursuant to §

13.1-716

or

13.1-766.1

.

“Notice”

is defined in §

13.1-610

.

“Organic law”

means the statute governing the internal affairs of a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity.

“Organic rules”

means the public organic record and private organic rules of a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity.

“Person”

includes an individual and an entity.

“Principal office”

means the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located, or, if there are no such offices, the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, so designated by the board of directors. The designation of the principal office in the most recent annual report filed pursuant to §

13.1-775

shall be conclusive for purposes of this chapter.

“Private organic rules”

means (i) the bylaws of a domestic or foreign corporation or nonstock corporation or (ii) the rules, regardless of whether in writing, that govern the internal affairs of an unincorporated entity, are binding on all its interest holders, and are not part of its public organic record. Where private organic rules have been amended or restated, the term means the private organic rules as last amended or restated.

“Proceeding”

includes civil suit and criminal, administrative, and investigatory action.

“Protected series”

has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Public corporation”

means a corporation that has shares listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by one or more members of a national or affiliated securities association.

“Public organic record”

means (i) the articles of incorporation of a domestic or foreign corporation or nonstock corporation or (ii) the document, the filing of which is required to create an unincorporated entity. Where a public organic record has been amended or restated, the term means the public organic record as last amended or restated.

“Record date”

means the date fixed for determining the identity of the corporation’s shareholders and their shareholdings for purposes of this chapter. The determinations shall be made as of the close of business at the principal office of the corporation on the record date unless another time for doing so is specified when the record date is fixed.

“Record shareholder”

means (i) the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of the corporation or (ii) the person identified as the beneficial owner of shares in a beneficial ownership certificate pursuant to §

13.1-664

on file with the corporation to the extent of the rights granted by such certificate.

“Registered limited liability partnership”

has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.79

.

“Secretary”

means the corporate officer or other individual to whom the board of directors has delegated responsibility under subsection C of §

13.1-693

for custody of the minutes of the meetings of the board of directors and of the shareholders and for authenticating records of the corporation.

“Series limited liability company”

has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Share exchange”

means a transaction pursuant to §

13.1-717

.

“Shareholder”

means a record shareholder.

“Shares”

means the units into which the proprietary interests in a corporation are divided.

“Sign”

or

“signature”

means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a document: (i) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol to a document, and includes any manual, facsimile, or conformed signature; or (ii) to attach to or logically associate with an electronic transmission an electronic sound, symbol, or process, and includes an electronic signature in an electronic transmission.

“State”

when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state, commonwealth, and the District of Columbia, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions; and a territory or insular possession, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions, of the United States.

“Subscriber”

means a person who subscribes for shares in a corporation, whether before or after incorporation.

“Subsidiary”

means, as to any corporation, any other corporation of which it owns, directly or indirectly, voting shares entitled to cast a majority of the votes entitled to be cast generally in an election of directors of such other corporation.

“Unincorporated entity”

or

“domestic unincorporated entity”

means a domestic partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership or business trust.

“United States”

includes district, authority, bureau, commission, department, and any other agency of the United States.

“Unrestricted voting trust beneficial owner”

means, with respect to any shareholder rights, a voting trust beneficial owner whose entitlement to exercise the shareholder right in question is not inconsistent with the voting trust agreement.

“Voting group”

means all shares of one or more classes or series that under the articles of incorporation or this chapter are entitled to vote and be counted together collectively on a matter at a meeting of shareholders. All shares entitled by the articles of incorporation or this chapter to vote generally on the matter are for that purpose a single voting group.

“Voting power”

means the current power to vote in the election of directors.

“Voting trust beneficial owner”

means an owner of a beneficial interest in shares of the corporation held in a voting trust established pursuant to subsection A of §

13.1-670

.

“Writing”

or

“written”

means any information in the form of a document.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-2; 1956, c. 428; 1962, c. 44; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1992, cc. 575, 802; 1993, c. 200; 1994, c. 122; 1997, cc. 190, 801; 2001, c. 545; 2002, cc. 1, 285; 2003, cc. 340, 728; 2005, c. 765; 2006, c. 663; 2007, c. 165; 2010, c. 782; 2012, c. 706; 2015, c. 611; 2016, c. 288; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, c. 122, which amended this section, in cl. 2 provides: “[t]hat the provisions of this act shall apply retroactively to filings made with the State Corporation Commission which fall within the scope of this act.”

Acts 1997, c. 801, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 1998. The powers granted and duties imposed pursuant to this act shall apply prospectively to guardians and conservators appointed by court order entered on or after that date, or modified on or after that date if the court so directs, without regard to when the petition was filed. The procedures specified in this act governing proceedings for appointment of a guardian or conservator or termination or other modification of a guardianship shall apply on and after that date without regard to when the petition therefor was filed or the guardianship or conservatorship created.”

Acts 2001, c. 545, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2002, c. 1, effective January 30, 2002, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on February 1, 2002; however, no domestication pursuant to Article 12.1 (§

13.1-722.2

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 13.1 shall occur prior to July 1, 2002, and no conversion pursuant to Article 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 13.1 shall occur prior to July 1, 2002, unless the converting entity is (i) a domestic corporation incorporated before July 1, 1970, and (ii) the corporation is authorized to issue 5,000 shares or more.”

Acts 2003, c. 340, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that amend and reenact §§

8.9A-406

,

8.9A-408

,

13.1-1001.1

,

13.1-1003

,

13.1-1012

,

50-73.2

,

50-73.84

, and

50-73.144

of the Code of Virginia and that amend the Code of Virginia by adding sections numbered 13.1-1010.4 and

13.1-1023.1

shall become effective on July 1, 2003, and that all other provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2003.”

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 1997 amendment

by c. 801, effective January 1, 1998, substituted “incapacitated” for “incompetent” in the paragraph defining “Individual.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 545, effective February 1, 2002, inserted “or which has become a domestic corporation of this Commonwealth pursuant to Article 12.1 (§

13.1-722.2

et seq.) or Article 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.) of this chapter” at the end of the definition of “Corporation” or “domestic corporation.” See Editor’s note.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 285 inserted the paragraph defining “Electronic transmission.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 340, effective October 1, 2003, inserted the definitions of “Domestic business trust” and “Foreign business trust.”

The 2003 amendment by c. 728 added the paragraph defining “Public corporation.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 inserted “domestication” in the definition of “Articles of incorporation” twice in the fourth sentence, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout, substituted “chapter” for “Act” in the definition of “Corporation,” rewrote definitions “Deliver,” “Entity,” “Individual,” “Public corporation” and “Record date,” inserted “Disinterested director,” “Domestic nonstock corporation,” “Eligible entity,” “Eligible interests,” “Foreign nonstock corporation,” “Foreign unincorporated entity,” “Interest,” “Membership,” “Organic document,” “Organic law,” “Subsidiary,” “Unincorporated entity” and “Voting power,” in the definition of “Electronic transmission,” deleted “of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act” following “§ 59.1-480” in the second sentence and deleted the third sentence, which formerly read: “For purposes of §§

13.1-657

and

13.1-685

, a written consent and the signing thereof may be accomplished by one or more electronic transmissions,” inserted “unless otherwise provided in the bylaws” in the definition of “Employee” and made a related changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 663, in the second sentence of the paragraph defining “Articles of incorporation,” inserted “consolidation, serial designation, reduction, correction and,” “for” following “except” and substituted “that does not include an amendment to the survivor’s articles of incorporation” for “consolidation, serial designation, reduction or correction.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165, in the definition of “Articles of incorporation,” inserted “share” in the third sentence and substituted “articles of restatement, amendment” for “articles of amendment” twice in the fourth sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782, in the definition of “conspicuous,” inserted “displayed, or presented” and substituted “text that is italicized, is in boldface, contrasting colors, or capitals, or is underlined” for “printing in italics or boldface or, contrasting color, or typing in capitals, or underlined”; inserted “if authorized in accordance with §

13.1-610

” in the definition “deliver”; added the definitions of “document,” “electronic,” and “electronic record”; rewrote the definition of “electronic transmission”; and added the definitions of “sign” and “writing.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 706, in the definition of “State,” substituted “state, commonwealth, and the District of Columbia, and” for “state and commonwealth, and” and “territory or insular possession” for “territory and insular possession.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 deleted “except for a certificate of merger with a subsidiary pursuant to §

13.1-719

that does not include an amendment to the survivor’s articles of incorporation” at the end of the second sentence of the definition for “Articles of incorporation.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288 substituted “that” for “which,” deleted “or Article 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.)” following “(§

13.1-722.2

et seq.)” and inserted “or Article 15 (§

13.1-1081

et seq.) of Chapter 12” at the end in the definition of “Corporation.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “a foreign partnership, foreign limited liability company, foreign limited partnership, or foreign business trust” for “an unincorporated entity whose internal affairs are governed by the organic law of a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth” in the definition for “Foreign unincorporated entity”; deleted the definition for “Partnership”; and added the definitions for “Protected series” and “Series limited liability company.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, § 48.

§ 13.1-604.
Filing requirements.

A document shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies these requirements, to be entitled to be filed with the Commission.

To be entitled to be filed with the Commission, this chapter shall require or permit the document to be filed with the Commission.

The document shall contain the information required by this chapter and may contain other information as well.

The document shall be typewritten or printed or, if electronically transmitted, shall be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced in typewritten or printed form. The typewritten or printed portion shall be in black. Photocopies, or other reproduced copies, of typewritten or printed documents may be filed. In every case, information in the document shall be legible and the document shall be capable of being reformatted and reproduced in copies of archival quality.

The document shall be in the English language. A corporate name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals. The articles of incorporation, duly authenticated by the official having custody of corporate records in the jurisdiction of formation of the foreign corporation, that are required of foreign corporations need not be in English if accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

The document shall be signed in the name of the domestic or foreign corporation:

By the chairman or any vice-chairman of the board of directors, the president, or any other of its officers;

If directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

Any annual report required to be filed by §

13.1-775

shall be signed in the name of the corporation by an officer or director listed in the report or, if the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The person executing the document shall sign it and state beneath or opposite his signature his name and the capacity in which the document is signed. The document may but need not contain a corporate seal, attestation, acknowledgment, or verification.

If, pursuant to any provision of this chapter, the Commission has prescribed a mandatory form for the document, the document shall be in or on the prescribed form.

The document shall be delivered to the Commission for filing and shall be accompanied by the correct filing fee, and any franchise tax, charter or entrance fee, registration fee, or penalty required by this chapter to be paid at the time of delivery for filing.

The Commission may accept the electronic transmission of any document or other information required or permitted to be filed by this chapter and may prescribe the methods of execution, recording, reproduction and certification of electronically transmitted information pursuant to § 59.1-496.

Whenever a provision of this chapter permits any of the terms of a plan or a filed document to be dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan or filed document, the following provisions apply:

The plan or filed document shall specify the nationally recognized news or information medium in which the facts can be found or otherwise state the manner in which the facts can be objectively ascertained. The manner in which the facts will operate upon the terms of the plan or filed document shall be set forth in the plan or filed document.

The facts may include:

Any of the following that is available in a nationally recognized news or information medium either in print or electronically: statistical or market indices, market prices of any security or group of securities, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or similar economic or financial data;

A determination or action by any person or body, including the corporation or any other party to a plan or filed document; or

The terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to which the corporation is a party, or any other agreement or document.

The name or qualification of the registered agent of any entity required in a filed document;

The number of authorized shares and the designation and terms, including the preferences, rights, and limitations of each class or series of shares;

The effective date of a filed document; and

Any required statement in a filed document of the date on which the underlying transaction was approved or the manner in which that approval was given.

As used in this subsection:

The following terms of a plan or filed document may not be made dependent on facts outside the plan or filed document:

If a term of a filed document is made dependent on a fact objectively ascertainable outside of the filed document, and that fact is not objectively ascertainable by reference to a source described in subdivision 2 a or a document that is a matter of public record, nor has notice of the fact been given by the corporation to the affected shareholders, then the corporation shall file with the Commission articles of amendment setting forth the fact promptly after the time when the fact referred to is first ascertainable or thereafter changes. Articles of amendment under this subdivision are deemed to be authorized by the authorization of the original filed document or plan to which they relate and may be filed by the corporation without further action by the board of directors or the shareholders.

The provisions of subdivisions 1, 2, and 5 shall not be considered by the Commission in deciding whether the terms of a plan or filed document comply with the requirements of law.

a.

“Filed document” means a document filed with the Commission under §

13.1-619

or Article 11 (§

13.1-705

et seq.), 12 (§

13.1-715.1

et seq.), 12.1 (§

13.1-722.1:1

et seq.), 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.), 16 (§

13.1-742

et seq.), or 22 (§

13.1-782

et seq.); and

b.

“Plan” means a plan of domestication, conversion, merger, or share exchange.

a.

The name and address of any person required in a filed document;

b.

A purpose that is required to be set forth in a filed document;

c.

The registered office address of any entity required in a filed document;

History.

1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 231; 1995, c. 70; 2000, c. 995; 2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 623; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 995 added “pursuant to § 59.1-496” at the end of subsection K.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 inserted “or if electronically transmitted shall be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced in typewritten or printed form” in the first sentence of subsection D; in subsection H substituted “a corporate” for “the corporate”, deleted “an” following “corporate seal” “by the secretary or an assistant secretary and an” following “attestation”, and deleted “or proof” following “verification”, and made a stylistic change; deleted “or by §

13.1-775.1

” at the end of subsection J; added subsection L.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 substituted “signed” for “executed” in subsections F and G; inserted “domestic or foreign” in subsection F; and in subsection H, substituted “signing” for “executing” and deleted “sign it and” following “document shall.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 inserted “or, if the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary” in subsection G.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote subsection B, which read: “The document shall be one that this chapter requires or permits to be filed with the Commission”; in subsection E, substituted “jurisdiction of formation of the foreign” for “state or country under whose law the,” and substituted “that” for “is incorporated, which”; in subdivision F 1, deleted “authorized to act on behalf of the corporation” following “officers”; in subsection H, substituted “executing” for “signing,” inserted “sign it and” and substituted “the document is signed” for “he signs. Any signature may be a facsimile”; in subsection J, substituted “correct” for “required,” inserted “or penalty” and added “to be paid at the time of delivery for filing” at the end; in subsection K, substituted “transmission of any document or other information” for “filing of any information”; in subdivision L 3 a., inserted “12.1 (§

13.1-722.1:1

et seq.), 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.), 16 (§

13.1-742

et seq.), or 22 (§

13.1-782

et seq.)”; in subdivision L 5, substituted “nor has” for “or the affected shareholders have not received,” substituted “fact been given by the corporation to the affected shareholders” for “fact from the corporation,” and deleted “objectively” preceding “ascertainable”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, inserted subdivision L 4 b and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; inserted “address” in subdivision L 4 c; inserted “name or qualification of the” in subdivision L 4 d; substituted “the designation and terms, including the preferences, rights, and limitations” for “designation” in subdivision L 4 e.

Law Review.

For 1994 survey of Virginia business and corporate law, see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 923 (1994).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 149.